Utah statutes.
73-18-6.   Numbering of motorboats and sailboats required -- Exception.

(1)  Every motorboat and sailboat on the waters of this state shall be numbered.  No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any motorboat or sailboat on the waters of this state unless the motorboat or sailboat is numbered in accordance with:

(a)  this chapter;

(b)  applicable federal law; or

(c)  a federally-approved numbering system of another state, if the owner is a resident of that state and his motorboat or sailboat has not been in this state in excess of 60 days for the calendar year.

(2)  The number assigned to a motorboat or sailboat in accordance with this chapter, applicable federal law, or a federally-approved numbering system of another state shall be displayed on each side of the bow of the motorboat or sailboat, except this requirement does not apply to any vessel which has a valid marine document issued by the United States Coast Guard.



Amended by Chapter 99, 1987 General Session

